Hawaii, session 2025, SB190.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Waikiki's safe and sound program has been effective at reducing crime in the Waikiki area. Since implementing the program in September 2022, Waikiki has experienced approximately forty-eight per cent fewer drug and alcohol-related crimes, nineteen per cent fewer robberies, thirty per cent fewer burglaries, and twenty-two per cent fewer incidents of criminal property damage.  The legislature recognizes that Waikiki's safe and sound program has achieved this reduction in crime, in part, by placing geographic restrictions on habitual criminal offenders. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to authorize similar geographic restrictions for habitual criminal offenders in other parts of the State. SECTION 2.  Chapter 706, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part II to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§706- Probationary geographic restrictions; Ewa Beach; Kapolei; Waianae.  (1)  If a person has been convicted of a misdemeanor, has had two prior misdemeanor convictions, and each conviction was the result of an act that occurred within a covered district, that person may be sentenced to a probationary term of geographic restriction not to exceed    years, during which the person shall be prohibited, between the hours of 6:00 p.m. and 6:00 a.m., from entering the covered district in which the acts occurred. (2)  Violation of an imposed geographic restriction shall be a misdemeanor, and the person shall be sentenced to imprisonment for thirty days. (3)  For purposes of this section: "Covered district" means any one of the following areas: (a)  Ewa Beach; (b)  Kapolei; or (c)  Waianae. "Ewa Beach" means the area of the island of Oahu that is designated as postal code 96706 by the United States Postal Service as of the effective date of this section. "Kapolei" means the area of the island of Oahu that is designated as postal code 96707 by the United States Postal Service as of the effective date of this section. "Waianae" means the area of the island of Oahu that is designated as postal code 96792 by the United States Postal Service as of the effective date of this section." SECTION 3.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 4.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________